GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST2/src/lex-lastnames.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     last names
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    SPANISH
!#
!# CREATED:	04-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols

+Prop 
+Lastname

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron +Abrev


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT
Acevedo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Acuña+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Aguilé+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Aguilés+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Alameda+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Alberti+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Alcántara+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Alcocer+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Alegre+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Almagro+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Alonso+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Amedo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Anguita+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Aparicio+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Araujo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Arconada+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Arenas+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Arias+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Aristizábal+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Armstrong+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Arozamena+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Arregui+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Arrieta+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Ascanio+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Asensi+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Aveledo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Ayuso+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Azcúnaga+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Baena+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Balaguer+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Baldivieso+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Baquero+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Baró+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Barreiro+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Basalto+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Becker+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Bejarano+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Beltrán+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Bengoechea+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Berlusconi+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Bernstein+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Bin% Laden+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Blázquez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Boffill+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Bonaparte+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Borges+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Bosé+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Botticelli+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Bravo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Bujanda+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Bustillo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Cabanillas+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Cadenas+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Calvino+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Camarillo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Campomanes+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Cano+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Carbajal+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Cardona+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Carpio+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Carrero+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Carrión+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Casal+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Casarrubios+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Castaño+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Ceballos+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Cerdá+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Chacón+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Chávez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Clinton+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Colina+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Colón+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Cordero+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Cortázar+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Corvalán+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Cousteau+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Cruz+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Dato+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Delvalle+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Díez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Duarte+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Durán+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Eastwood+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Enríquez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Escrivá+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Espinoza+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Estévez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Fàbregas+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Fernán+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Ferreira+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Fidalgo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Flores+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Frayle+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Fromm+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Gaitán+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Gallagher+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Gálvez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
García+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Garrido+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Gasset+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Gemio+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Gimenez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Goicoechea+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Gollanes+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
González+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Goytisolo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Gross+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Guillén+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Guzmán+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Henríquez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Hernández+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Herrero+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Hobbes+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Hudson+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Humboldt+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Ibarra+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Indurain+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Iriarte+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Iturralde+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Jiménez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Kárpov+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Koyré+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Labrada+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Lagos+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Lancaster+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Laredo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Lasalde+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Lecquio+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Liébana+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Lizarralde+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Llull+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
López+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Loyola+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Luna+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
MacGraw+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Maldonado+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Manrique+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Margallo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Martínez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Martos+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Matos+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
McCarthy+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Mejía+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Mena+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Menéndez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Merckx+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Mesa+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Millás+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Molero+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Monroe+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Montalvo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Montesinos+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Montilla+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Morales+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Moreira+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Moret+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Moros+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Mota+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Muñiz+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Narbona+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Navarrete+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Navratilova+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Nebrija+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Nieto+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Nogal+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Novales+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Obregón+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Olaizábal+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Olivares+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Oliveras+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Onassis+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Ordaz+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Orozco+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Osío+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Otero+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Pajares+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Palmieri+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Paredes+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Pastor+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Pedraza+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Peña+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Pereira+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Perón+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Piñana+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Pinochet+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Pizarro+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Polanski+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Porras+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Poza+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Presley+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Puente+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Punceles+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Quesada+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Quintanilla+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Rahola+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Rasputín+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Rembrandt+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Reynosa+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Rivadavia+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Robespierre+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Rodríguez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Román+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Roosevelt+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Rosemberg+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Rossell+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Rubens+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Russell+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Sáez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Salcedo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Salieri+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Samaniego+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Sandoval+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Santana+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Santoni+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Sarasola+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Saura+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Schneider+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Schuster+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Semprún+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Serrat+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Simpson+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Solchaga+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Solozábal+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Sotelo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Soto+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Spielberg+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Stevens+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Tabares+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Tejeda+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Tellado+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Tkachenko+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Torricelli+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Treviño+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Tudela+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Ugalde+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Unzueta+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Uribe+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Urrutia+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Valderrama+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Valdivieso+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Valera+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Valverde+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Varga+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Vega+Prop+Lastname		XSG;	!@
Velásquez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Vera+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Vergara+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Videla+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Vilar+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Villalonga+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Wagner+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Washington+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Wayne+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Williams+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Yánez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Yépez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Zambrano+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Zubieta+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Zurbarán+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Arcipreste% de% Hita+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Bécquer+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Calderón% de% la% Barca+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Celaya+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
de% Goya+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Descartes+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Einstein+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Feijoo+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Galdós+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Gaudí+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Góngora+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Guillén+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Lennon+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Maquiavelo+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Menéndez% Pidal+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Mozart+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Ortega% y% Gasset+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Pérez% Galdós+Prop+Lastname	XSG;
Saavedra% y% Ramírez% de% Baquedano+Prop+Lastname	XSG;	!Duque de Rivas
Trotsky+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
Velázquez+Prop+Lastname		XSG;
